Mississippi, session 2026, HB1685.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The school board of each school district shall adopt a policy regulating the content of books made available for purchase by students at book fairs hosted by schools within that district.  The policy must include, but need not be limited to, provisions addressing the following: (a)  Restrictions prohibiting the inclusion of books containing themes, characters or any references relating to matters sexual in nature, sexual orientation or gender identity; (b)  A requirement that the vendor or sponsor of a book fair provide to the school a list of the titles that will be offered to students; (c)  A requirement that the school principal designate the school librarian or another licensed employee to review the list to identify books that, due to their content, may not be included in the book fair; (d)  A requirement that the agreement to host the book fair include a provision that if the vendor or sponsor of the book fair refuses to exclude those titles identified by the school employee, the school may not host the fair and will not incur any penalty or charges for cancellation of the event; and (e)  A requirement that the agreement between a school hosting a book fair and the vendor or sponsor of the book fair include such other provisions as may be necessary to ensure compliance with this section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.